Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-411
Precinct, township, city of the second class, or village bonds; payment; taxes; levy and collection.

The county boards, city councils of cities of the second class, or boards of trustees of villages or the person charged with levying the taxes, shall each year until the bonds issued under the authority of section 10-409 be paid, levy upon the taxable property in the precinct, township, city of the second class or village, a tax sufficient to pay the interest and five percent of the principal as a sinking fund; and at the tax levy preceding the maturity of any such bonds, levy an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest due on said bonds.

Laws 1885, c. 58, § 3, p. 270;

Laws 1899, c. 49, § 3, p. 263;

R.S.1913, § 415;

C.S.1922, § 332;

C.S.1929, § 11-411;

R.S.1943, § 10-411.

Levy of tax for sanitary drainage district authorized. Lang v. Sanitary District, 160 Neb. 754, 71 N.W.2d 608 (1955).